Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
24-7-401. Fund contributions — Fund rates.

The financial objective of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System is to establish and receive contributions that expressed as percentages of active member payroll will remain approximately level from generation to generation of Arkansas citizens.

Contributions received each year shall be sufficient:

To fully cover the costs of benefit commitments being made to members for their service being rendered in that year; and

To make a level payment that if paid annually over a reasonable period of future years will fully cover the unfunded costs of benefit commitments for service previously rendered.

If the costs of benefit commitments for service previously rendered are overfunded, the plan may deduct a level payment that if deducted annually over a reasonable period of future years will fully liquidate the overfunded portion of the costs.

An actuarial valuation of the entire system shall be made at least annually by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System's actuary.

For each fiscal year, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall establish employer contribution rates for the system prospectively and for each fiscal year thereafter.

The employer contribution rates shall be based on the actuary's determination of the rate required to fund the plan in accordance with the objectives stated in subsection (a) of this section.

The employer contribution rates shall be the rates determined by the board based on the annual actuarial valuation.

For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2008, through June 30, 2013, the employer contribution rate shall not exceed fourteen percent (14%).

Beginning July 1, 2015, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the employer contribution rate shall not exceed fifteen percent (15%).

Until July 1, 2015, the employer contribution rate shall not exceed fourteen percent (14%).

For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2018, and each fiscal year thereafter, the board may modify the employer contribution rate for future fiscal years above fourteen percent (14%) in increments of one-fourth of one percent (0.25%) per fiscal year provided that the system has a greater than eighteen-year amortization period to pay unfunded liabilities without an employer contribution rate of more than fourteen percent (14%) limited to a maximum employer contribution rate of fifteen percent (15%).

If a report provided by the system's actuary shows that the system's amortization period to pay unfunded liabilities is eighteen (18) years or less with a fourteen-percent employer contribution rate, then the employer contribution rate shall not exceed fourteen percent (14%).

An increase in the employer contribution rate shall only occur if the system implements cost savings from member benefit programs or increased member contributions, or both, measured after July 1, 2013, that equal or exceed the value of the employer contribution increase before or at the same time as an employer contribution increase.

The cost savings from member benefit programs or increased member contributions, or both, shall take place or be approved before or at the same time as an employer contribution increase.

The system may rely upon actuarial reports by the system's actuary to determine the relative impact of changes to member benefit programs or increased member contributions, or both, including whether the cost savings from member benefit programs or increased member contributions, or both, are equal to or exceed the value of the proposed employer contribution increase.

The value of cost savings from a member benefit program or member contribution increases shall be set at the time of the initial actuarial report that establishes the estimated value and shall remain as initially set unless the member benefit program or member contribution rate has changes after the actuarial report sets value.

The employer contribution rate shall be such that the amortization period for all unfunded liability shall not exceed thirty (30) years. However, under no circumstance shall the required employer contribution rate exceed the maximum percentage rate under subsection (c) of this section.

The board shall annually notify the participating employers of the employer contribution rate established by the board for the upcoming fiscal year.

Local school districts shall pay the teacher retirement employment contribution for any eligible employee in accordance with rules established by the board.

The Department of Education shall pay from the Public School Fund the teacher retirement employer contributions for eligible employees of participating employers as required by the department's appropriations act and in accordance with rules established by the board.

The annual employer contributions to be paid in each year for all other employees by each participating employer shall be the current state contribution percent multiplied by the total covered salaries of the employer's members in the fiscal year.

The employers' contributions shall be remitted to the system in such manner and form and in such frequency and shall be accompanied by such supporting data as the board shall prescribe from time to time.

Timely payment of the contributions shall be a condition of continuance of participation in the system.

All employers shall pay the total employer contribution rate except as provided under subdivision (7)(B) of this section.

A public school employer shall pay the employer contribution rate up to fourteen percent (14%), and any additional employer contribution up to fifteen percent (15%) required by a public school employer shall be paid from additional funds appropriated by the State of Arkansas for the purpose of paying Arkansas Teacher Retirement System employer contributions.

An increase or decrease in an employer contribution rate shall:

Apply to a complete fiscal year; and

Remain in effect until modified by the board.

The board may adopt a change in the employer contribution rate by resolution at any board meeting.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 8; 1975, No. 549, § 5; 1977, No. 541, § 4; 1979, No. 681, § 2; 1981, No. 365, § 5; 1983, No. 619, § 8; 1983, No. 665, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1442; Acts 1989, No. 472, § 1; 1991, No. 17, § 1; 1991, No. 431, § 2; 1993, No. 435, §§ 2, 3; 2005, No. 1968, § 2; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 19, § 9; 2007, No. 403, § 2; 2009, No. 468, § 5; 2013, No. 1399, § 1; 2013, No. 1446, § 1; 2017, No. 821, § 1; 2019, No. 594, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to § 1-2-207, subdivision (c)(5) is set out above as added by Acts 2013, No. 1446, § 1. Acts 2013, No. 1399, § 1, also enacted a subdivision (c)(5) that read as follows:

“(5)(A) Beginning July 1, 2013, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the employer contribution rate shall not exceed fifteen percent (15%).

“(B)(i) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2013, and each fiscal year thereafter, the board may modify the employer contribution rate for the next fiscal year above fourteen percent (14%) only if the annual report from the system's actuary provided for the previous fiscal year establishes that the system has a greater than thirty-year amortization period to pay unfunded liabilities without an employer contribution rate of more than fourteen percent (14%).

“(ii) If a report provided by the system's actuary shows that the system's amortization period to pay unfunded liabilities is thirty (30) years or less with a fourteen percent (14%) employer contribution rate, then the employer contribution rate shall not exceed fourteen percent (14%).”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (c), substituted “each fiscal year” for “the fiscal years ending June 30, 2008, and June 30, 2009” in (c)(1) and inserted “and in each fiscal year thereafter” in (c)(4); inserted “however under no circumstance shall the required employer contribution rate exceed the maximum percentage rate under subdivision (c)(4) of this section” in (d); substituted “participating” for “local school districts, the Department of Education, and other” in (e)(1); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment by No. 1399 substituted “through June 30, 2013” for “and June 30, 2009, and in each fiscal year thereafter” in (c)(4); added (c)(5); substituted “subsection (c)” for “subdivision (c)(4)” in (d); and added (e)(7), (8), and (9).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1446 added (c)(5).

The 2017 amendment, in (c)(5)(B)(i), substituted “2018” for “2015”, “future fiscal years” for “the next fiscal year”, “per fiscal year provided” for “only if the annual report from the system's actuary provided for the previous fiscal year establishes”, and “eighteen-year” for “thirty-year”; substituted “eighteen (18)” for “thirty (30)” in (c)(5)(B)(ii); and deleted (c)(5)(B)(iv).

The 2019 amendment, in (e)(7)(B), inserted “additional” and substituted “appropriated by the State of Arkansas” for “appropriated to the Department of Education”.

24-7-402. Assets as trust fund — Custodian.

All assets of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall constitute a single trust fund, and the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall be the trustees of the fund.

The custodian of system assets shall be the Treasurer of State or other financial institutions or depositories as allowed under this subchapter.

When acting as custodian of system assets, the Treasurer of State shall act in accordance with the instructions of the board.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 7; 1975, No. 381, § 2; 1975, No. 839, § 2; 1977, No. 793, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1441; Acts 2009, No. 468, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment subdivided (b), inserted “or other financial institutions or depositories as allowed under this subchapter” in (b)(1), substituted “When acting as custodian of system assets, the Treasurer of State” for “who” in (b)(2), and made a related change.

24-7-403. Restrictions on use of assets.

All assets of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall be held for the sole purpose of paying benefits and making disbursements in accordance with the provisions of this act and shall be used for no other purpose whatsoever, unless the assets are used to purchase or construct a building to be used for the permanent offices of the system upon approval of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

Except as to the rights of a member, retirant, or beneficiary, no trustee and no officer or employee of the board shall have any interest, direct or indirect, in the gains or profits of any investment made by the board. Nor shall any of them, directly or indirectly, for himself or herself or as an agent, in any manner use the assets of the system except to make such current and necessary payments as are authorized by the board; nor shall any of them become an endorser or surety or become in any manner an obligor for moneys loaned by or borrowed from the board.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 7; 1975, No. 381, § 2; 1975, No. 839, § 2; 1977, No. 793, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1441; Acts 1989, No. 652, § 2.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-7-401.

24-7-404. Default where issuer receives money from State of Arkansas.

In the event of default in payment of the principal or interest of any investment obligation held by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System where the issuer of the obligation receives moneys from the State of Arkansas, the default shall be certified by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System to the Treasurer of State, who shall withhold all moneys due the issuer from the State of Arkansas until the default, together with interest thereon, is satisfied.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 7; 1975, No. 381, § 2; 1975, No. 839, § 2; 1977, No. 793, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1441; Acts 2011, No. 45, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment deleted “regular” preceding “interest thereon.”

24-7-405. Retirement fund assets accounts generally.

The assets of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall be recorded in accounts established by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, as necessary, to manage the system's fund assets.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1442; Acts 2011, No. 41, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment rewrote the section.